Utah statutes.
63M-1-504.   Targeted business income tax credit structure -- Duties of the
local zone administrator -- Duties of the State Tax Commission.
(1)  For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, a business
applicant that is certified under Subsection 63M-1-503(3) and issued a
targeted business tax credit eligibility form by the office under Subsection
(8) may claim a refundable tax credit:
(a)  against the business applicant's tax liability under:
(i)  Title 59, Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(ii)  Title 59, Chapter 10, Individual Income Tax Act; and
(b)  subject to requirements and limitations provided by this part.
(2)  The total amount of the targeted business income tax credits allowed
under this part for all business applicants may not exceed $300,000 in any
fiscal year.
(3) (a)  A targeted business income tax credit allowed under this part for
each community investment project provided by a business applicant may not:
(i)  be claimed by a business applicant for more than seven consecutive
taxable years from the date the business applicant first qualifies for a
targeted business income tax credit on the basis of a community investment
project;
(ii)  be carried forward or carried back;
(iii)  exceed $100,000 in total amount for the community investment project
period during which the business applicant is eligible to claim a targeted
business income tax credit; or
(iv)  exceed in any year that the targeted business income tax credit is
claimed the lesser of:
(A)  50% of the maximum amount allowed by the local zone administrator; or
(B)  the allocated cap amount determined by the office under Subsection
63M-1-503(5).
(b)  A business applicant may apply to the local zone administrator to claim a
targeted business income tax credit allowed under this part for each community
investment project provided by the business applicant as the basis for its
eligibility for a targeted business income tax credit.
(4)  Subject to other provisions of this section, the local zone administrator
shall establish for each business applicant that qualifies for a targeted
business income tax credit:
(a)  criteria for maintaining eligibility for the targeted business income tax
credit that are reasonably related to the community investment project that is
the basis for the business applicant's targeted business income tax credit;
(b)  the maximum amount of the targeted business income tax credit the
business applicant is allowed for the community investment project period;
(c)  the time period over which the total amount of the targeted business
income tax credit may be claimed;
(d)  the maximum amount of the targeted business income tax credit that the
business applicant will be allowed to claim each year; and
(e)  requirements for a business applicant to report to the local zone
administrator specifying:
(i)  the frequency of the business applicant's reports to the local zone
administrator, which shall be made at least quarterly; and
(ii)  the information needed by the local zone administrator to monitor the
business applicant's compliance with this Subsection (4) or Section 63M-1-503
that shall be included in the report.
(5)  In accordance with Subsection (4)(e), a business applicant allowed a
targeted business income tax credit under this part shall report to the local
zone administrator.
(6)  The amount of a targeted business income tax credit that a business
applicant is allowed to claim for a taxable year shall be reduced by 25% for
each quarter in which the office or the local zone administrator determines
that the business applicant has failed to comply with a requirement of
Subsection (3) or Section 63M-1-503.
(7)  The office or local zone administrator may audit a business applicant to
ensure:
(a)  eligibility for a targeted business income tax credit; or
(b)  compliance with Subsection (3) or Section 63M-1-503.
(8)  The office shall issue a targeted business income tax credit eligibility
form in a form jointly developed by the State Tax Commission and the office no
later than 30 days after the last day of the business applicant's taxable year
showing:
(a)  the maximum amount of the targeted business income tax credit that the
business applicant is eligible for that taxable year;
(b)  any reductions in the maximum amount of the targeted business income tax
credit because of failure to comply with a requirement of Subsection (3) or
Section 63M-1-503;
(c)  the allocated cap amount that the business applicant may claim for that
taxable year; and
(d)  the actual amount of the targeted business income tax credit that the
business applicant may claim for that taxable year.
(9) (a)  A business applicant shall retain the targeted business income tax
credit eligibility form provided by the office under this Subsection (9).
(b)  The State Tax Commission may audit a business applicant to ensure:
(i)  eligibility for a targeted business income tax credit; or
(ii)  compliance with Subsection (3) or Section 63M-1-503.
